Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,156
Workers' compensation insurance; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates sections 44-3,151 to 44-3,155 is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 6.